Utah statutes.
49-18-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.
(1) Judges appointed after July 1, 1997, are members of and are eligible for
service credit in this system.
(2) (a)  Any judge appointed prior to July 1, 1997, may either become a member
of the Judges' Noncontributory Retirement System or remain a member of the
Judges' Contributory Retirement System established under Chapter 17, Judges'
Contributory Retirement Act, by following the procedures established by the
board pursuant to this chapter.
(b)  Judges may only elect to participate in this system under Subsection (2)
prior to January 1, 1998.
